Washington statutes.
RCW 43.133.010

Legislative declaration.

Because of the proliferation of boards and special purpose districts, the legislature recognizes the necessity of developing a uniform and coordinated procedure for determining the need for these new units of government.

[ 1987 c 342 s 1.]